District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.33

Eminent domain.

(a)

The Mayor may exercise eminent domain in accordance with the procedures set forth in subchapter II of Chapter 13 of Title 16 to acquire properties in the New Convention Center Hotel Site to construct and develop the New Convention Center Hotel and such other real properties that the Mayor determines are necessary or convenient to construct a connection between the New Convention Center Hotel and the New Convention Center.

(b)

The New Convention Center Hotel shall be constructed for the purpose of enhancing the New Convention Center and, to the extent the Mayor determines feasible, shall be physically connected to the New Convention Center, above or below grade, to permit direct access between the New Convention Center Hotel and the New Convention Center. The New Convention Center Hotel shall be located adjacent to or in close proximity to the New Convention Center and shall have approximately 1,100 rooms and suites, together with meeting and ballroom space, and other ancillary facilities, including retail, customarily found in similar convention center hotels.

History

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 233, formerly § 803
as added Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-163, § 201, 53 DCR 5430
Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-144, § 3(h), 55 DCR 2527
renumbered Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 122(i), 56 DCR 1117

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-144 rewrote the section.
D.C. Law 17-353, in the credit, renumbered the section designation from § 803 to § 233.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 201 of New Convention Center Hotel Omnibus Financing and Development Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-404, June 26, 2006, 53 DCR 5404).